Utah statutes.
11-42-105.   No limitation on other local entity powers -- Conflict with other statutory provisions.

(1)  This chapter may not be construed to limit a power that a local entity has under other applicable law to:

(a)  make an improvement or provide a service;

(b)  create a district;

(c)  levy an assessment or tax; or

(d)  issue bonds or refunding bonds.

(2)  If there is a conflict between a provision of this chapter and any other statutory provision, the provision of this chapter governs.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

